Utah statutes.
9-4-902.   Policy -- Finding and declaration.
(1)  It is declared that the policy of the state of Utah is to assure the
health, safety, and welfare of its citizens, that an adequate supply of
decent, safe, and sanitary housing is essential to the well-being of the
citizens of the state, and that an adequate supply of mortgage funds for
housing at reasonable interest rates is in the public interest.
(2)  It is found and declared that:
(a)  there continues to exist throughout the state a seriously inadequate
supply of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations within the financial means
of persons and families of low or moderate income who wish to purchase or rent
residential housing; and
(b)  from time to time the high rates of interest charged by mortgage lenders
seriously restrict the transfer of existing housing and new housing starts.
(3)  It is found and declared that the reduction in residential construction
starts associated with the high rates causes a condition of substantial
unemployment and underemployment in the construction industry which impedes
the economy of the state and affects the welfare and prosperity of all the
people of the state.
(4)  It is found and declared that:
(a)  these conditions associated with the recurrent shortages of residential
mortgage funds contribute to slums and blight in the cities and rural areas of
the state and ultimately to the deterioration of the quality of living
conditions within the state; and
(b)  in accordance with the purpose of this part to assist in providing
housing for low and moderate income persons who otherwise could not achieve
decent, safe, and sanitary housing, the agency shall make every effort to make
housing available in rural, inner city, and other areas experiencing
difficulty in securing construction and mortgage loans, and to make decent,
safe, and sanitary housing available to low income persons and families.
(5)  It is found and declared that in order to assure an adequate fund of
private capital into this housing, the cooperation between private enterprise
and state government is essential and is in the public interest.
(6)  It is found and declared that low and moderate income persons in Utah
have a wide range of housing needs, which necessitates the development of many
different kinds of programs to address those needs, including programs
providing mortgage loans, nontraditional loans, grants, and other forms of
financial assistance, and combinations of these forms.
(7)  It is found and declared that there are private organizations and
governmental entities throughout Utah that are endeavoring to improve the
availability of housing for low and moderate income, but many of these
organizations and entities lack expertise and financial resources to act
efficiently and expeditiously in these efforts.
(8)  It is found and declared that innovative programs that bring together
resources from the public, nonprofit, and private sector are necessary in
order to increase the supply of housing for low and moderate individuals, but
these programs usually need advice and financial assistance to become
established.
(9)  It is declared that all of the foregoing are public purposes and uses for
which money may be borrowed, expended, advanced, loaned, or granted, and that
these activities serve a public purpose in improving or otherwise benefiting
the people of this state, and that the necessity of enacting the provisions in
this part is in the public interest and is so declared as a matter of express
legislative determination.
(10)  It is found and declared that the compelling need within the state for
the creation of an adequate supply of mortgage funds at reasonable interest
rates and for other kinds of financial assistance to help provide affordable
housing for low and moderate income individuals can be best met by the
establishment of an independent body corporate and politic, constituting a
public corporation, vested with the powers and duties specified in this part.
(11)  It is declared that the corporation is intended to operate:
(a)  with the power to issue tax exempt bonds to finance the purchase of
mortgage loans to qualified buyers;
(b)  as a financially independent body; and
(c)  so that its debts shall be payable solely from payments received by the
corporation from mortgage borrowers and other revenues generated internally by
the corporation.
